Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-132
Certificate of registration; contents; how treated.

Upon compliance by the applicant with the requirements of the Trademark Registration Act, the secretary shall return the duplicate copy of the application stamped with the filing date to the applicant. The certificate of registration shall be issued under the signature of the secretary and the seal of the state, and it shall show the name and business address and, if a corporation, the state of incorporation, or if a partnership, the state in which the partnership is organized and the names of the general partners, as specified by the secretary, of the person claiming ownership of the mark, the date claimed for the first use of the mark anywhere and the date claimed for the first use of the mark in this state, the class of goods or services and a description of the goods or services on or in connection with which the mark is used, a reproduction of the mark, the registration date, and the term of the registration. An original, a duplicate original, or a certified copy of an application for trademark which has the file stamp and date of the secretary shall be admissible in evidence as competent and sufficient proof of the registration of such mark in any actions or judicial proceedings in any court of this state. Registration of a mark with the secretary shall be prima facie evidence of the right to use the mark shown in the registration on or in connection with the class or classes of goods or services designated in the registration.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 7.